Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
844D]

FORENSIC
IDENTIFICATION

Part I. Definitions, Administration

Section

844D-1 Definitions

844D-2 Administration

Part II. Collection, Analysis, and
Repository

844D-21 Collection of specimens, samples, and
print

impressions at correctional facility or
other

detention facility

844D-22 Analysis and examination of specimens for

identification purposes

844D-23 Repository of samples and records

844D-24 Sexual assault evidence; reporting

Part III. Offenders Subject to Collection
of Specimens

or Samples, or Print Impressions

844D-31 Offenders subject to collection

844D-32 Application to all qualifying persons

844D-33 Notification by prosecutor and inquiry by
court

844D-34 Collection from persons confined or in
custody after

conviction or adjudication

844D-35 Collection from persons on probation,
parole, or other

release

844D-36 Collection from parole violators and
others returned

to custody

844D-37 Collection from persons accepted into
Hawaii from

other jurisdictions

844D-38 Collection of replacement specimen found
spoiled or

unusable

844D-39 Collection of specimen from sex offense
registrants

844D-40 Collection of specimens from persons
required to

register under chapter 846E who have not
yet

provided samples

844D-41 Retroactive application

Part IV. Crime Scene and Related Evidence;
Comparison

Against Forensic Identification
Data

844D-51 Analysis of crime scene samples

844D-52 Anonymous analysis of specimens and
samples

844D-53 Analysis of forensic identification
profiles

844D-54 Laboratories contributing DNA profiles to
be accredited

844D-55 Other law enforcement DNA laboratories

844D-56 Limitations not cause for dismissal

844D-57 No invalidation based on erroneous
placement or

retention of specimens, samples, or print
impressions

Part V. Sample and Specimen Collection
Paraphernalia

and Instructions; Civil or Criminal
Liability

for Collection; and Data Entry

844D-61 Blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and
print

impressions shall be forwarded promptly to
the

department

844D-62 Procedures for the collection and
forwarding of samples

844D-63 Limitations on civil and criminal
liability

844D-64 Processing of offender specimens

Part VI. Request for Expungement of
Information;

Procedure

844D-71 Expungement of DNA information from state
DNA database

and data bank identification program

844D-72 Destruction of samples and expungement of
searchable

DNA database profile

844D-73 No authorization to relieve a person of
administrative

duty to provide specimens, samples, or
print

impressions

844D-74 Not a basis for invalidation of
identification or

suppression of identification evidence

Part VII. Exemption of Specimen from
Disclosure;

Confidentiality

844D-81 Exemption of specimen from disclosure

844D-82 Confidentiality

844D-83 Knowing use or disclosure by department
employee of

forensic identification information for
other than

criminal identification or exclusion
purposes

844D-84 When disclosure is not a violation

844D-85 Confidentiality of computer software and
database

structures

Part VIII. Data Sharing; Population
Database or Data

Bank Information; Protocol,
Quality Control

or Methodology; Sample Sharing;
Local

DNA Laboratories; Disposal

844D-91 Department permitted to share data,
information, and

samples

844D-92 Local DNA laboratories

844D-93 Disposals of unused and expired specimens

Part IX. Powers Not Affected

844D-101 Law enforcement officer powers under other
laws not

affected

844D-102 Authority under other laws not affected

Part X. Crimes

844D-111 Refusal or failure to provide specimen for
forensic

identification

844D-112 Fraudulent use or manipulation of
biometric sample or

information

844D-113 Unauthorized disclosure of DNA sample or
profile

844D-114 Use of DNA sample or profile for financial
gain

Part XI. Post-Conviction DNA Testing

844D-121 Petition for post-conviction DNA testing

844D-122 Proceedings

844D-123 Order for post-conviction DNA testing

844D-124 Counsel

844D-125 Discovery

844D-126 Retention of biological evidence

844D-127 Choice of laboratory

844D-128 Payment

844D-129 Appeal

844D-130 Successive motions

844D-131 Additional orders

844D-132 Procedure after testing results are
obtained

844D-133 Consent

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next